Utah statutes.
58-37-4.   Schedules of controlled substances -- Schedules I through V --
Findings required -- Specific substances included in schedules.
(1)  There are established five schedules of controlled substances known as
Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V which shall consist of substances listed in
this section.
(2)  Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V consist of the following drugs or other
substances by the official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand
name designated:
(a)  Schedule I:
(i)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of
the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, when the existence of the isomers,
esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
(A)  Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl
(N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);
(B)  Acetylmethadol;
(C)  Allylprodine;
(D)  Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol also known as levo-
alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;
(E)  Alphameprodine;
(F)  Alphamethadol;
(G)  Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]
propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);
(H)  Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(I)  Benzethidine;
(J)  Betacetylmethadol;
(K)  Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(L)  Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, other name: N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-
phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;
(M)  Betameprodine;
(N)  Betamethadol;
(O)  Betaprodine;
(P)  Clonitazene;
(Q)  Dextromoramide;
(R)  Diampromide;
(S)  Diethylthiambutene;
(T)  Difenoxin;
(U)  Dimenoxadol;
(V)  Dimepheptanol;
(W)  Dimethylthiambutene;
(X)  Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(Y)  Dipipanone;
(Z)  Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(AA)  Etonitazene;
(BB)  Etoxeridine;
(CC)  Furethidine;
(DD)  Hydroxypethidine;
(EE)  Ketobemidone;
(FF)  Levomoramide;
(GG)  Levophenacylmorphan;
(HH)  Morpheridine;
(II)  MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
(JJ)  Noracymethadol;
(KK)  Norlevorphanol;
(LL)  Normethadone;
(MM)  Norpipanone;
(NN)  Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl] propanamide;
(OO)  PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
(PP)  Phenadoxone;
(QQ)  Phenampromide;
(RR)  Phenomorphan;
(SS)  Phenoperidine;
(TT)  Piritramide;
(UU)  Proheptazine;
(VV)  Properidine;
(WW)  Propiram;
(XX)  Racemoramide;
(YY)  Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-
propanamide;
(ZZ)  Tilidine;
(AAA)  Trimeperidine;
(BBB)  3-methylfentanyl, including the optical and geometric isomers
(N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]- N-phenylpropanamide); and
(CCC)  3-methylthiofentanyl
(N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide).
(ii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(A)  Acetorphine;
(B)  Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(C)  Benzylmorphine;
(D)  Codeine methylbromide;
(E)  Codeine-N-Oxide;
(F)  Cyprenorphine;
(G)  Desomorphine;
(H)  Dihydromorphine;
(I)  Drotebanol;
(J)  Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
(K)  Heroin;
(L)  Hydromorphinol;
(M)  Methyldesorphine;
(N)  Methylhydromorphine;
(O)  Morphine methylbromide;
(P)  Morphine methylsulfonate;
(Q)  Morphine-N-Oxide;
(R)  Myrophine;
(S)  Nicocodeine;
(T)  Nicomorphine;
(U)  Normorphine;
(V)  Pholcodine; and
(W)  Thebacon.
(iii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following hallucinogenic substances, or which contains any of their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation; as used
in this Subsection (2)(iii) only, "isomer" includes the optical, position, and
geometric isomers:
(A)  Alpha-ethyltryptamine, some trade or other names: etryptamine; Monase;
α-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole; α-ET; and AET;
(B)  4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, some trade or other names:
4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-α-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;
(C)  4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxypenethylamine, some trade or other names:
2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl DOB; 2C-B,
Nexus;
(D)  2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine, some trade or other names:
2,5-dimethoxy-α-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;
(E)  2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine, some trade or other names: DOET;
(F)  4-methoxyamphetamine, some trade or other names:
4-methoxy-α-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;
(G)  5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
(H)  4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, some trade and other names:
4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-α-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP";
(I)  3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(J)  3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(K)  3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl- alpha-
methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;
(L)  N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-
methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA;
(M)  3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(N)  Bufotenine, some trade and other names:
3-(β-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol;
N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;
(O)  Diethyltryptamine, some trade and other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine;
DET;
(P)  Dimethyltryptamine, some trade or other names: DMT;
(Q)  Ibogaine, some trade and other names:
7-Ethyl-6,6β,7,8,9,10,12,13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyrido [1',
2':1,2] azepino [5,4-b] indole; Tabernanthe iboga;
(R)  Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(S)  Marijuana;
(T)  Mescaline;
(U)  Parahexyl, some trade or other names:
3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran;
Synhexyl;
(V)  Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically
as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof,
any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture,
salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or
extracts (Interprets 21 USC 812(c), Schedule I(c) (12));
(W)  N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(X)  N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(Y)  Psilocybin;
(Z)  Psilocyn;
(AA)  Tetrahydrocannabinols, synthetic equivalents of the substances contained
in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic
substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity such as the following: Δ1 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers Δ6 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers Δ3,4 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers, and since nomenclature of these
substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures,
regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered;
(BB)  Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine, some trade or other names:
N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine,
N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;
(CC)  Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine, some trade or other names:
1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
(DD)  Thiophene analog of phencyclidine, some trade or other names:
1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine,
TPCP, TCP; and
(EE)  1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine, some other names: TCPy.
(iv)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
(A)  Mecloqualone; and
(B)  Methaqualone.
(v)  Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous
system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:
(A)  Aminorex, some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or
4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine;
(B)  Cathinone, some trade or other names: 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone,
alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone, and norephedrone;
(C)  Fenethylline;
(D)  Methcathinone, some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone;
alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one;
alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; ephedrone;
N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its
salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;
(E)  (±)cis-4-methylaminorex
((±)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
(F)  N-ethylamphetamine; and
(G)  N,N-dimethylamphetamine, also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-
benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine.
(vi)  Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of the following substances, including their optical isomers, salts,
and salts of isomers, subject to temporary emergency scheduling:
(A)  N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (benzylfentanyl); and
(B)  N-[1- (2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide
(thenylfentanyl).
(vii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
gamma hydroxy butyrate (gamma hydrobutyric acid), including its salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers.
(b)  Schedule II:
(i)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of
the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction
from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical
synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(A)  Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of
opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene,
naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including:
(I)  Raw opium;
(II)  Opium extracts;
(III)  Opium fluid;
(IV)  Powdered opium;
(V)  Granulated opium;
(VI)  Tincture of opium;
(VII)  Codeine;
(VIII)  Ethylmorphine;
(IX)  Etorphine hydrochloride;
(X)  Hydrocodone;
(XI)  Hydromorphone;
(XII)  Metopon;
(XIII)  Morphine;
(XIV)  Oxycodone;
(XV)  Oxymorphone; and
(XVI)  Thebaine;
(B)  Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation which is chemically
equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in Subsection
(2)(b)(i)(A), except that these substances may not include the isoquinoline
alkaloids of opium;
(C)  Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(D)  Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca
leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation which is chemically
equivalent or identical with any of these substances, and includes cocaine and
ecgonine, their salts, isomers, derivatives, and salts of isomers and
derivatives, whether derived from the coca plant or synthetically produced,
except the substances may not include decocainized coca leaves or extraction
of coca leaves, which extractions do not contain cocaine or ecgonine; and
(E)  Concentrate of poppy straw, which means the crude extract of poppy straw
in either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phenanthrene
alkaloids of the opium poppy.
(ii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, when the existence of the isomers,
esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation, except dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene:
(A)  Alfentanil;
(B)  Alphaprodine;
(C)  Anileridine;
(D)  Bezitramide;
(E)  Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms);
(F)  Carfentanil;
(G)  Dihydrocodeine;
(H)  Diphenoxylate;
(I)  Fentanyl;
(J)  Isomethadone;
(K)  Levo-alphacetylmethadol, some other names: levo-alpha-acetylmethadol,
levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;
(L)  Levomethorphan;
(M)  Levorphanol;
(N)  Metazocine;
(O)  Methadone;
(P)  Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane;
(Q)  Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenylpropane-
carboxylic acid;
(R)  Pethidine (meperidine);
(S)  Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;
(T)  Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;
(U)  Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;
(V)  Phenazocine;
(W)  Piminodine;
(X)  Racemethorphan;
(Y)  Racemorphan;
(Z)  Remifentanil; and
(AA)  Sufentanil.
(iii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:
(A)  Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical
isomers;
(B)  Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
(C)  Phenmetrazine and its salts; and
(D)  Methylphenidate.
(iv)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
(A)  Amobarbital;
(B)  Glutethimide;
(C)  Pentobarbital;
(D)  Phencyclidine;
(E)  Phencyclidine immediate precursors: 1-phenylcyclohexylamine and
1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC); and
(F)  Secobarbital.
(v) (A)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
Phenylacetone.
(B)  Some of these substances may be known by trade or other names:
phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; and methyl benzyl ketone.
(vi)  Nabilone, another name for nabilone:
(±)-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a-hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6, 6
-dimethyl-9H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-one.
(c)  Schedule III:
(i)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system,
including its salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and
salts of the isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(A)  Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form containing
any stimulant substances listed in Schedule II, which compounds, mixtures, or
preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted compounds under
Section 1308.32 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any other
drug of the quantitive composition shown in that list for those drugs or which
is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of controlled
substances;
(B)  Benzphetamine;
(C)  Chlorphentermine;
(D)  Clortermine; and
(E)  Phendimetrazine.
(ii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:
(A)  Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing amobarbital,
secobarbital, pentobarbital, or any salt of any of them, and one or more other
active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule;
(B)  Any suppository dosage form containing amobarbital, secobarbital, or
pentobarbital, or any salt of any of these drugs which is approved by the Food
and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;
(C)  Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric
acid or any salt of any of them;
(D)  Chlorhexadol;
(E)  Buprenorphine;
(F)  Any drug product containing gamma hydroxybutyric acid, including its
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an application is approved
under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, Section 505;
(G)  Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, some other names for
ketamine: ± -2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone;
(H)  Lysergic acid;
(I)  Lysergic acid amide;
(J)  Methyprylon;
(K)  Sulfondiethylmethane;
(L)  Sulfonethylmethane;
(M)  Sulfonmethane; and
(N)  Tiletamine and zolazepam or any of their salts, some trade or other names
for a tiletamine-zolazepam combination product: Telazol, some trade or other
names for tiletamine: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone, some trade
or other names for zolazepam:
4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo-[3,4-e]
[1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, flupyrazapon.
(iii)  Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin
capsule in a U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved drug product, some
other names for dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-
tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-1-ol, or
(-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.
(iv)  Nalorphine.
(v)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of
any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free
anhydrous base or alkaloid:
(A)  Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than
90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an
isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;
(B)  Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than
90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active non-narcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(C)  Not more than 300 milligrams of dihydrocodeinone per 100 milliliters or
not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater
quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;
(D)  Not more than 300 milligrams of dihydrocodeinone per 100 milliliters or
not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-
narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(E)  Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or not more
than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active non-narcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(F)  Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or not
more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(G)  Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100
grams, or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more
active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; and
(H)  Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 milliliters or per 100
grams with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts.
(vi)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
anabolic steroids including any of the following or any isomer, ester, salt,
or derivative of the following that promotes muscle growth:
(A)  Boldenone;
(B)  Chlorotestosterone (4-chlortestosterone);
(C)  Clostebol;
(D)  Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone;
(E)  Dihydrotestosterone (4-dihydrotestosterone);
(F)  Drostanolone;
(G)  Ethylestrenol;
(H)  Fluoxymesterone;
(I)  Formebulone (formebolone);
(J)  Mesterolone;
(K)  Methandienone;
(L)  Methandranone;
(M)  Methandriol;
(N)  Methandrostenolone;
(O)  Methenolone;
(P)  Methyltestosterone;
(Q)  Mibolerone;
(R)  Nandrolone;
(S)  Norethandrolone;
(T)  Oxandrolone;
(U)  Oxymesterone;
(V)  Oxymetholone;
(W)  Stanolone;
(X)  Stanozolol;
(Y)  Testolactone;
(Z)  Testosterone; and
(AA)  Trenbolone.
(vii)  Anabolic steroids expressly intended for administration through
implants to cattle or other nonhuman species, and approved by the Secretary of
Health and Human Services for use, may not be classified as a controlled
substance.
(d)  Schedule IV:
(i)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing not more than 1
milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per
dosage unit, or any salts of any of them.
(ii)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when
the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation:
(A)  Alprazolam;
(B)  Barbital;
(C)  Bromazepam;
(D)  Butorphanol;
(E)  Camazepam;
(F)  Carisoprodol;
(G)  Chloral betaine;
(H)  Chloral hydrate;
(I)  Chlordiazepoxide;
(J)  Clobazam;
(K)  Clonazepam;
(L)  Clorazepate;
(M)  Clotiazepam;
(N)  Cloxazolam;
(O)  Delorazepam;
(P)  Diazepam;
(Q)  Dichloralphenazone;
(R)  Estazolam;
(S)  Ethchlorvynol;
(T)  Ethinamate;
(U)  Ethyl loflazepate;
(V)  Fludiazepam;
(W)  Flunitrazepam;
(X)  Flurazepam;
(Y)  Halazepam;
(Z)  Haloxazolam;
(AA)  Ketazolam;
(BB)  Loprazolam;
(CC)  Lorazepam;
(DD)  Lormetazepam;
(EE)  Mebutamate;
(FF)  Medazepam;
(GG)  Meprobamate;
(HH)  Methohexital;
(II)  Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
(JJ)  Midazolam;
(KK)  Nimetazepam;
(LL)  Nitrazepam;
(MM)  Nordiazepam;
(NN)  Oxazepam;
(OO)  Oxazolam;
(PP)  Paraldehyde;
(QQ)  Pentazocine;
(RR)  Petrichloral;
(SS)  Phenobarbital;
(TT)  Pinazepam;
(UU)  Prazepam;
(VV)  Quazepam;
(WW)  Temazepam;
(XX)  Tetrazepam;
(YY)   Triazolam;
(ZZ)   Zaleplon; and
(AAA)   Zolpidem.
(iii)  Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation of fenfluramine which
contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts,
isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of the isomers when
the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible.
(iv)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the
following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system,
including its salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric isomers,
and salts of the isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts
of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(A)  Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
(B)  Diethylpropion;
(C)  Fencamfamine;
(D)  Fenproprex;
(E)  Mazindol;
(F)  Mefenorex;
(G)  Modafinil;
(H)  Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof;
(I)  Phentermine;
(J)  Pipradrol;
(K)  Sibutramine; and
(L)  SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane).
(v)  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any
material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1,
2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane), including its salts.
(e)  Schedule V: Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the
following limited quantities of narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as
the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, which includes one or more non-narcotic
active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the
compound, mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than
those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
(i)  not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100
grams;
(ii)  not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or
per 100 grams;
(iii)  not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or
per 100 grams;
(iv)  not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25
micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
(v)  not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100
grams;
(vi)  not more than 0.5 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms
of atropine sulfate per dosage unit; and
(vii)  unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
Pyrovalerone having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.
